Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.270

Conveyance of escheated property to claimant.

In the event the order of the court requires the delivery of real property to the claimant, a certified copy of such order shall be served upon the department of natural resources which shall thereupon make proper certification to the office of the governor for issuance of a quitclaim deed for the property to the claimant.

[ 1988 c 128 s 3; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.270. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 15.]